New York, session 2025-2026, A6808.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2324 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (d-1) to read as follows: 3 (d-1) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit an insurer, 4 or a person acting in conjunction with, or on behalf of an insurer, from 5 providing an insured, or a prospective insured, with loss reduction or 6 safety related electronics, equipment or devices or items, or special 7 offers or other things of value or incentives designed to assist an 8 insured under a policy in managing the risks they may face while they 9 are an insured or in promoting driver safety for prospective insureds. 10 In carrying out the provisions of this subsection, an insurer may 11 provide similar but not necessarily identical devices or items to 12 insureds and prospective insureds. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02416-01-5